2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-la-x-liturgic.pat.txt
.a3b3??q
.a2b1ali
.a2b1auu
.a2b3c
.a2b1eo
.??2b1eo
.a2b1er
.a2b1??r
.??2b1er
.a4b3es
.a4b3??s
.a2b1e3u
.??2b1e3u
.a2b1e3??
.a2b1??3u
.a2bf
.a2b1??
.a2b1ic
.a2b1i2ec
.a2b1i2??c
.a2b3ier
.a2b3i??r
.a2b1ig
.??2b3ig
.a2b1i2i
.a2b1i2??
.??2b1i2i
.a2b1in1
.a2b1ir
.a2b1it
.??2b1it
.a2b1i4u
.a2b1i4??
.a2b1iv
.a2bj
.a2b3l
.??2b3lu
.a2b1ol
.a2b1??l
.a2b1om
.a2b1or
.a2b1??r
.a2b1ort
.a2b3r
.??2b3r
.a3b4rah
.??3b4rah
.a2b3ru
.ab4s3temi
.ab4s3t??mi
.ab5s4temini.
.ab5s4t??mini.
.ab4s3ten
.ab4s3t??n
.ab5s4tent.
.ab5s4tentur.
.ab5s4t??ntur.
.ab4s3terg
.ab4s3t??rg
.ab4s3terr
.ab4s3t??rr
.ab4s3ters
.ab4s3t??rs
.ab4s3tol
.ab4s3t??l
.ab4s3trah
.ab4s3tr??h
.??b4s3trah
.ab4s3tras
.ab4s3tr??s
.ab4s3trax
.ab4s3tr??x
.ab4s3tru
.ab4s3tr??
.??b4s3tru
.ab4s3tu
.ab4s3t??
.??b4s3tu
.absu2b3l
.abs??2b3l
.a2b3und
.a2b3??nd
.a2b3us
.a2b3ut
.a2b3??t
.a2d3
.??2d3
.a3d4??
.a4d5??q
.a3d4am.
.a3d4amant
.a2d3a3s4cr
.a3d4eps
.ader2
.ade3u
.a2dfu
.adi2a
.??di2a
.adi2??
.a3d4i3ab
.a3d4i3??b
.adi2e
.adi2??
.adi3en
.adi3??n
.ad3i2i
.ad3i2??
.adi2o
.??di2o
.a3d4ip
.a3d4??p
.??3d4ip
.a4d5ipisc
.a4d5ip??sc
.ad5is.
.ad5it.
.ad3i2u
.ad3i2??
.??di2u
.ado2b3
.ad??2b3
.a4d3ole
.a3d4on
.a3d4??n
.a3d4ramy
.a3d4ran
.a3d4r??n
.??3d4ran
.ad3s2cr
.ad3si
.a2d5s2t
.??2d5s2tr
.adsu3e
.a3d4u3a
.a3d4u3??
.a4d5ul
.a3d4urn
.a3d4y
.a3d4??
.??3d4y
.alte3r
.alt??3r
.??lte3r
.alte4rc
.alt??4rc
.alte4rn
.alt??4rn
.alte4rp
.alt??4rp
.alte4rt
.alt??4rt
.alte4r3ut
.alt??4r3ut
.alte4r3??t
.am2b3a2d3
.am2b3??2d3
.am2b3ag
.??m2b3ag
.am2b3??g
.am2b3arv
.am2b3ax
.am2b3??x
.am2b3ed
.??m2b3ed
.am2b3??d
.am2b3es
.am2b3??s
.am2b3i
.??m2b3i
.am2b3??
.am3b4iani
.am3b4i??ni
.am3b4iano
.am3b4i??no
.am3b4ian??
.am3b4iatin
.am3b4iat??n
.am3b4ibar
.am3b4ib??r
.am3b4ic
.am3b4??c
.am3b4id
.??m3b4id
.ambi2ec
.ambi2??c
.am3b4ieg
.am3b4i??g
.am3b4if
.am3b4igene
.am3b4ig??ne
.am3b4igen??
.am3b4igenus.
.am3b4??genus.
.am3b4il
.am3b4??l
.am3b4ima
.am3b4??ma
.am3b4iori
.am3b4ior??
.am3b4??ori
.am3b4isin
.am3b4iso
.am3b4is??
.am3b4itex
.am3b4it??x
.am3b4itr
.am3b4itut
.am3b4??tut
.am3b4iva
.am3b4ivia
.am3b4??via
.am3b4ivie
.am3b4??vie
.am3b4ivii
.am3b4??vii
.am3b4ivio
.am3b4ivi??
.am3b4??vio
.am3b4iviu
.am3b4??viu
.am3b4ix.
.am2b3ur
.am2b3??r
.am2b3us
.am2b3??s
.ani2m3ad
.ante3u
.anti1
.anti3m2n
.ape3r2u
.archi3e
.a3s2c
.??3s2c
.a3s4pu
.a3s4p??
.??3s4pu
.a6s5plen
.a6s5pl??n
.a6s5purg
.a6s5p??rg
.a3s2t
.??3s2t
.a4sthm
.a4s3tr
.??4s3tr
.a5s4trat
.a5s4tr??t
.a5s4trid
.a5s4tr??d
.a5s4tru
.??5s4tru
.a5s4tr??
.a6s5trum.
.b2
.beni4a
.b??ni4a
.be4th5l
.b??4th5l
.bou6s5tr
.c2
.circu4m1
.circ??4m1
.circumam2b3
.circum??m2b3
.circumam3b4ul
.circumam3b4??l
.circum??m3b4ul
.circume3u
.circume3??
.circumi2a
.circumi2??
.circumi2e
.circumi2??
.circumi2i
.circumi2??
.circumi2n3i4i
.circumi2n3i4??
.circumi2o
.circumi2u
.circumo2b3
.circum??2b3
.circum5s4
.circ??4m5s4
.ci2s3
.co1e
.co3e2lec
.co3e2lig
.co3emen
.co2e1n
.co3e2r
.co3e2x3
.coex3s2
.co3g2nos
.co3g2n??s
.co1i
.co1i2e
.coi3u
.co2m3ed
.co2m3??d
.c??2m3ed
.co2m3es.
.co2m3it
.co2m3??t
.c??2m3it
.co2n1
.c??2n1
.co3n2a
.co3n2??
.co3n2e
.co3n2??
.co3n2i
.co3n2??
.coni2a
.con3ic
.conde3s4p
.coni2e
.co6n5i4ec
.co6n5i4??c
.co6n3i4i
.co6n3i4??
.co4n3i2u
.co4n3i2??
.c??4n3i2u
.co3n2o
.co3n2??
.con3s2cr
.c??n3s2cr
.con3s4p
.c??n3s4p
.co3n2u
.co3n2??
.cre3u
.cu4ll
.cu4mm
.cu4sp
.c??4sp
.de1??
.d??1i
.de1in
.de1??n
.de1it
.depe4r5
.dep??4r5
.d??pe4r5
.de3s2c
.de3s4p
.d??3s4p
.de3s2q
.de3s2t
.d??3s2t
.de3u
.de4uc
.de4ul
.de4urio
.de4ur??o
.de4uter.
.de4utera
.de4uter??
.de4uter??
.de4uteri
.de4ut??ri
.de5uteris.
.de5ut??ris.
.de4utero
.de4uter??
.de4uteru
.dia3s4p
.di3g2nosc
.di3i4u
.di3i4??
.di3??
.di2r1im
.di2r1??m
.di5s4ced
.di5s4c??d
.di5s4cen
.di5s4c??n
.di5s4cep
.di5s4c??p
.di5s4cer
.di5s4c??r
.di5s4ces
.di5s4c??s
.di5s4cid
.di5s4c??d
.di5s4cin
.di5s4c??n
.di5s4cip
.di5s4c??p
.di5s4ciss
.di5s4c??ss
.di5s4cit
.d??5s4cit
.di5s4cr
.di6s5cre
.di6s5cr??
.di6s5crim
.di6s5cr??m
.di6s5cru
.di6s5cruc
.di6s5cr??c
.di5s4ert
.di5s4??rt
.di2s1i2
.di2s1??2
.disi3c
.dis??3c
.di2sj
.dispe2r3
.disp??2r3
.di5s4ta
.di5s4t??
.di5s4tin
.di5s4t??n
.di6s5tine
.di6s5t??ne
.di5s4tir
.di5s4t??r
.di5s4to.
.di5s4trar
.di5s4tr??r
.di5s4trat
.di5s4tr??t
.di5s4trav
.di5s4tr??v
.di3u
.di3??
.dy6s5p6n
.ei5on
.ele3usa
.ele3us??
.e2t3en
.??2t3en
.e2t3i3am
.??2t3i3am
.e2t3i3??m
.e3u3ax.
.e3??3ax.
.eu3s2tom
.eu3s2t??m
.eu3s2ty
.eu3s2t??
.e2x3
.??2x3
.exam2b3i
.exam2b3??
.ex??m2b3i
.e3x4ed
.??3x4ed
.e3x4??d
.e3x4eget
.e3x4eg??t
.exo2b3
.ex??2b3
.e3x4od
.??3x4od
.e3x4??d
.e3x4orc
.e3x4ost
.e3x4??st
.ex5s4c
.??x5s4c
.ex3s4p
.??x3s4p
.ex5s2t
.??x5s2t
.f2
.g2
.gai4
.h2
.he3i.
.hi2e
.hi2??
.hucu4s
.hu1i2u
.hu1i2??
.i4a
.i4??
.iai2u
.i3bi
.i3b??
.i3bo
.i3b??
.i3bu
.i3b??
.i3co
.i3c??
.i2d1
.i2dci
.i3d2e
.i3d2??
.??3d2e
.i4d3em
.i5den
.i4d3eo.
.??4d3eo.
.i4d3eoq
.i4d3e??q
.i4d3es
.i3d2ib
.i3di2og
.i3d2ol
.i3d2??l
.i3d2on
.i3d2??n
.i3d2us
.i2e
.i2??
.iei2u
.i3i
.i3??
.??3i
.i4n3
.??4n3
.ina2b3r
.inab3s2
.ina2cr
.ina2df
.i3n2an
.i3n2??n
.incircu4m
.incon5s4tr
.inc??n5s4tr
.in4d3ep
.in4d3??p
.in4d3ig
.??n4d3ig
.in5d4ign
.in5d4??gn
.in4d3ipis
.in4d3ip??s
.in5d4is
.in4d3u
.??n4d3u
.in4d3??
.in5d4u.
.in5d4ub
.in5d4??b
.in5d4uc
.in5d4??c
.in6d5ucul
.in6d5??cul
.in5d4ug
.in5d4ul
.in5d4??l
.in5d4up
.in5d4ur
.in5d4??r
.??n5d4ur
.in5d4us.
.in5d4u5s4tr
.in5d4??5s4tr
.in5d4uti??
.in5d4??ti??
.in5d4utia
.in5d4uti??
.in5d4??tia
.in5d4utii
.in5d4??tii
.in5d4utio
.in5d4uti??
.in5d4ux
.in5d4??x
.i3n2ers
.i3n2ert
.ine2x3
.inexs2t
.infra3s4
.ini2e
.ini2??
.ini2??
.i3n2it
.ini2u
.ini2??
.ino2b3
.in??2b3
.inobi6ur
.inpe2r3iur
.in3s4cr
.in3s4p
.??n3s4p
.in5s2t
.??n5s2t
.inte2r3e
.inte2r3??
.int??2r3e
.inte3r4em
.inte3r4??m
.inte3r4en
.inte3r4??n
.inte3r4er
.int??3r4er
.inte3r4??r
.inte3r4es
.inte4r5ess
.inte3r4et
.inte3r4??t
.inte2r3i
.inte2r3??
.int??2r3i
.??nte2r3i
.interi2a
.interi2??
.interi2e
.inter??2e
.interi2??
.interi2i
.interi2??
.inte3r4i3or
.inte3r4i3??r
.int??3r4i3or
.interi2u
.interi2??
.inte3r4ius.
.int??3r4ius.
.inter3s4p
.inter5s4t
.int??r5s4t
.intran2s1
.intro3i3e
.intro3i3??
.inu2a
.inu2e
.inu2i
.i3n2ul
.i4n3ulc
.inu2o
.inu2u
.i2o
.i2??
.i4u
.i4??
.i5ul
.i5??l
.i6uli
.i6??li
.i7uli.
.i7??li.
.i7ulid
.i7??lid
.i7ulis.
.i7??lis.
.iu2s3i2ur
.j2
.l2
.langu4ere.
.langu4??re.
.langu4eri.
.langu4??ri.
.la4u
.lecti5s4t
.lon2g1an
.lon2g1??n
.lu4x3q
.lu3x2u
.lu3x2??
.m2
.mai4u
.n2
.ne2c1op
.ne2c1??p
.ne2g1ot
.ne2g1??t
.ne3ut
.n??3ut
.o2b3
.??2b3
.o3b4el
.??3b4el
.obi2ac
.obi2??c
.obi2ec
.obi2??c
.obi2ic
.obi2??c
.??bi2ic
.o3b4il
.o3b4??l
.obi2ur
.obi2??r
.o3b4ol
.??3b4ol
.o4b5ole
.o4b5ol??
.??4b5ole
.o3b4rim
.o3b4russ
.o3b4r??ss
.o3b4ryz
.o3b4r??z
.ob3s2q
.ob5st
.??b5st
.p2
.p??2n3ins
.p??2n3??ns
.para1i
.para1u
.par3s4tr
.pe1i6or
.pe1i6??r
.pe2r1abs
.pe2r1ac
.pe2r1??c
.pe2r1a2dp
.pe2r1a2d1u
.pe2r1ae
.pe2r3ag
.pe2r3??g
.p??2r3ag
.pe2r1ama
.pe2r1am??
.pe2r1amb
.pe2r1??mb
.pe4r3ant
.pe2r1ar
.pe2r1??r
.pe2r1a2u
.pe2r1coq
.pe2r1cu
.pe2r3ea
.pe2r3e??m
.p??2r3eam
.p??2r3eant
.pe2r3e??t
.p??2r3eat
.pe2r3eas
.p??2r3eas
.pe4r3ec
.pe4r1ed
.pe2r1eff
.pe2r3??g
.pe2r3eg
.pe6r3egr
.p??6r3egr
.pe2r1el
.pe2r1em
.pe2r1??m
.pe4r5end
.pe4r5??nd
.pe4r3enn
.pe4r3??nn
.pe2r3eo
.p??2r3eo
.pe4r3err
.pe4r3??rr
.pe2r1eru
.pe2r3es.
.pe4r1e2x3
.pe2r3h
.p??2r3h
.pe2r3i1
.pe2r3??1
.pe3r4ia
.pe3r4i??
.pe2r1i2ac
.pe3r4ian
.pe2r3ib
.pe2r3??b
.pe3r4icl
.pe3r4??cl
.pe3r4icu
.pe3r4??cu
.pe2r3ie
.pe2r3??e
.pe2r3i??
.pe3r4ieb
.pe3r4i??b
.pe3r4iem
.pe3r4i??m
.pe3r4ien
.pe3r4i??n
.pe4r5iens
.p??4r5iens
.pe3r4ier
.pe3r4??er
.pe3r4i??r
.pe4r5iera
.p??4r5iera
.pe4r5??era
.pe5r6ierat
.p??5r6ierat
.pe5r6??erat
.perie3i
.pe3r4iet
.pe3r4i??t
.peri??3i
.per??e3i
.pe2r1i2ec
.p??2r3ii
.per5iit
.p??r5iit
.pe3r4ileu
.pe3r4il??u
.pe4r3im
.pe4r3??m
.p??4r3im
.pe5r4imed
.pe5r4imi
.pe5r4??mi
.pe5r4imu
.pe5r4??mu
.pe6r5imus
.pe6r5??mus
.pe2r3in
.pe2r3??n
.pe3r4int
.pe3r4??nt
.pe3r4io
.pe3r4iod
.pe3r4??od
.pe3r4i??d
.pe5r4ip
.pe2r3ir
.pe5r4irr
.pe3r4iremur
.pe3r4ir??mur
.pe3r4iremi
.pe3r4ir??mi
.pe3r4irentur
.pe3r4ir??ntur
.pe3r4irer
.pe3r4ir??r
.pe3r4??rer
.pe3r4iret
.pe3r4ir??t
.pe4r5iret.
.pe4r5iretis
.pe4r5ir??tis
.pe3r4iri
.pe3r4??ri
.pe3r4i3s2c
.pe3r4??3s2c
.pe5r4isseu
.pe5r4iss??u
.pe3r4i3st
.pe3r4??3st
.pe3r4it
.pe3r4??t
.pe4r5it??r
.pe4r5itur
.pe4r5??tur
.pe4r5it.
.pe4r5itote
.pe4r5it??te
.pe2r3i4u
.p??2r3i4u
.pe2r3i4??
.pe3r4i5un
.pe3r4i5??n
.pe4r3j
.p??4r3j
.pe2r1o2b
.pe2r1od
.pe2r1of
.pe2r1ol
.pe2r1op
.pe4r3or
.pe4r3??r
.pe2r3reg
.pe2r3s2c
.pe2r3s2t
.p??2r3s2t
.pe2r3tran2s1
.pe2r3tr??n2s1
.pe2r3u
.pe2r3??
.pe2r1u2a
.pe2r1u2e
.pe2r1u2i
.pe3r4ul
.pe3r4??l
.pe2r1u2o
.po3et
.pos4t3ea
.pos4t3e??
.p??s4t3ea
.pos4t3er
.pos4t3??r
.p??s4t3er
.pos5t4erg
.pos4t3h
.po4s4t3hac
.pos4t3il
.pos4t3??l
.posu3??
.p??su3i
.po2t3e
.po2t3??
.p??2t3e
.po4t3ue
.po4t3ui
.po4t3??e
.po4t3??i
.po4t3u??
.po4t3u??
.p??4t3ui
.pr??1
.pr??3a2u
.pr??3es
.pr??e2x1
.pr????2x1
.pr??i4a
.pr??i4??
.pr??i4ec
.pr??in3s4t
.pr????n3s4t
.pr??i4o
.pr??i4i
.pr??i4??
.pr??i4u
.pr??i4??
.pr??3s2c
.pr??5s2t
.pr??5s2t
.pr??te2r1
.pr??t??2r1
.primi1
.primi3s2c
.pro2d1ea
.pr??2d1ea
.pro3d2eamb
.pro2d1eo
.pr??2d1eo
.pro2d1es3s
.pro2d1??s3s
.pro2d1e3un
.pr??2d1e3un
.pro2d1fu2
.pro2d1ib
.pro3d2i3d
.pro3d2??3d
.pro2d1ien
.pro2d1i??n
.pr??2d1ien
.pro2d1ier
.pro2d1i??r
.pr??2d1ier
.pro2d1ig
.pro2d1??g
.pr??2d1ig
.pro2d3ii.
.pr??2d3ii.
.pro2d1im
.pro2d1ir
.pro2d1??r
.pro2d3is
.pro2d3??s
.pro2d5it
.pro2d5??t
.pro3d6iti
.pro3d6??ti
.pro3d6ito
.pro3d6??to
.pro3d6itr
.pro3g2n
.pro3i4e
.pro3i4??
.pro3i4i
.pro3i4??
.pr??3i4i
.pro3in
.propte2r3
.propt??2r3
.pro3s2c
.pro6s5para
.pro5s2t
.pro5s4tan
.pro5s4tar
.pro4s3tit
.pro3u
.pseu2d3a
.pseudo3s4
.pseud??3s4
.p4t
.pulei4
.pul??i4
.qua2m3o2b3
.qu??2m3o2b3
.quattuo2r3
.que2m3a2d3m
.que2m3??2d3m
.quin2c3un
.quoa2d3usq
.quoa2d3??sq
.quo6d5l
.quo6n3iam
.qu??6n3iam
.quo2t1an
.quo2t1??n
.quo2t1enn
.quo2t1??nn
.quo2t3li
.qu??2t3li
.r2
.ra2y
.reco2n3i2u
.reco2n3i2??
.re2d1ac
.re2d1??c
.re2d1ad
.re2d1??d
.re2d1am
.re2d1??m
.r??2d1am
.re3d4amn
.re3d4??mn
.re2d1an
.re2d1??n
.re2d1ar
.re2d1??r
.re3d4ari
.re3d4??ri
.re2d1a2u
.re2d1??2u
.re2d1ea
.r??2d1ea
.re2d1e??
.re2d1eg
.re2d1??g
.re2d1em
.re2d1??m
.re2d1eo
.r??2d1eo
.re2d1e3u
.re2d1e3??
.r??2d1e3u
.re2d1h
.re2d1i.
.re2d1ib
.re2d1??b
.re3d2ic
.re2d1ien
.r??2d1ien
.re2d1ier
.re2d1??er
.re2d1i??r
.re2d1ii
.r??2d1ii
.re2d1??i
.re2d1i??
.re2d1ig
.r??2d1ig
.re2d1im
.re2d1??m
.r??2d1im
.re4d3imi
.re2d1in
.re2d1??n
.redin2d3
.re2d1ir
.re2d1??r
.re2d5is
.re2d5it
.re2d5??t
.r??2d5it
.re2d1iv
.re2d1??v
.re2d1ol
.re2d1??l
.r??2d1ol
.re2d1op
.re2d1??p
.re2d1ord
.re2d1??rd
.re3d2orm
.re2d1orn
.re2d1??rn
.re2d1ul
.re2d1??l
.re2d1un
.re2d1??n
.re2d1uv
.re2d1??v
.ree2x
.re1ie
.re3i2ec
.re1in
.re3ips
.re3ite
.repa2u
.re3s2cr
.re3s2cu
.re3s2c??
.re3s4p
.r??3s4p
.re6s5pu4b3l
.re6s5p??4b3l
.re5s4ta
.re5s4t??
.re5s2tag
.re5s4ta2u
.re5s2ter
.re5s2t??r
.re5s2tib
.re5s2t??b
.re5s2tic
.re6s3ticu
.re5s2til
.re5s2tin
.re5s2t??n
.re5s2tip
.re5s2t??p
.r??5s4tit
.re5s4tit
.re5s4t??t
.re5s2to
.re5s4tr
.r??5s4tr
.retran2s1
.retr??n2s1
.re3ul
.re3um
.rhe4u.
.s2
.sa2t1ag
.sa2t1??g
.sati2s1
.sa3ul.
.seme2t3ip
.semiam2b3
.semi3s4p
.se2m3un
.se2m3us
.se3s4cen
.ses2c1u4n
.si2c1ut
.s??2c1ut
.si3s2ten
.s2m
.sta3g2n
.su2b3
.s??2b3
.subam2b3
.subi4a
.subi4??
.subi4e
.subi4??
.subi4i
.subi4??
.s??bi4i
.subi4u
.s??bi4u
.subi4??
.subne3u
.subn??3u
.sub5s4cr
.sub3s4p
.subte2r3h
.subte2r3s4tr
.su3b4ul
.s??3b4ul
.su4b5ulc
.su4b5ult
.supe2r1a2b3l
.supe2r1??2b3l
.supe2r1a2b3n
.supe2r1a2b3und
.supe2r1a2b3??nd
.supe2r1ac
.supe2r1??c
.supe2r1ad
.supe2r1??d
.supe2r1a2d1i2
.supe2r1??2d1i2
.supe3r2??.
.supe2r1??
.supe2r1af
.supe2r1??f
.supe2r1ag
.supe2r1??g
.supe2r1al
.supe2r1??l
.supe2r1amb
.supe2r1??mb
.supe2r1ap
.supe2r1arg
.supe2r1asc
.supe2r1asp
.supe2r1a5s6t
.supe2r1??5s6t
.supe3r2a6s7ti.
.supe3r2??6s7ti.
.supe3r2a6s7tis.
.supe3r2??6s7tis.
.supe2r1att
.supe2r1??tt
.supe2r1au
.supe2r1ea
.sup??2r1ea
.supe2r1??a
.supe2r1e??
.supe2r1eb
.supe2r1ed
.supe2r1??d
.sup??2r1ed
.supe2r1ef
.supe2r1??f
.supe2r1eg
.supe2r1??g
.supe2r1el
.supe2r1??l
.supe2r1emi
.supe2r1??mi
.supe2r1em??
.supe3r2emini.
.supe3r2??mini.
.supe2r1emo
.supe2r1??mo
.supe2r1em??
.supe2r1en
.supe2r1??n
